Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1030
Unused budget
authority for general fund
budget of expenditures; carried forward; limitation.

A
Class II, III, IV, V, or VI district may choose not to increase its general
fund budget of expenditures by the full amount of budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures as
calculated pursuant to section
79-1023. In such cases, the department shall calculate the amount
of unused budget authority which shall be carried forward to future budget
years. The amount of unused
budget authority that may be used by a district in a single school fiscal
year to increase its general fund budget of expenditures above the budget
authority for the general fund budget of expenditures as calculated pursuant
to section 79-1023 shall be limited to two percent of the difference of the
general fund budget of expenditures minus the sum of special grant funds,
the special education budget of expenditures, and exceptions pursuant to subsection
(1) of section 79-1028.01 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3821;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 676;

Laws 1998, LB 989, § 13;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 32;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 91;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 23.